North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 3. Security Funds. [Repealed]

§§ 97-105 through 97-122.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991 (Regular Session, 1992), c. 802, s. 12, as amended by Session Laws 1991 (Regular Session, 1992), c. 1030, s. 51.3.

Cross References.

As to disposition of funds in the Stock Workers’ Compensation Security Fund and the Mutual Workers’ Compensation Security Fund, see

G.S. 58-48-105

through 58-48-130.

§§ 97-123 through 97-129.

Reserved for future codification purposes.